South Dakota, session 2026, SB78.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 2 be AMENDED:
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
(3) Governor's Office of Economic Development
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$1,368,614" and insert "$1,668,614"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$28,675,155" and insert "$44,050,155"
Section 2. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 3 be AMENDED:
BUREAU OF FINANCE AND MANAGEMENT (BFM)
(5) Employee Compensation and Billing Pools
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$1,803,149" and insert "$2,545,044"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$1,201,447" and insert "$1,903,073"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$3,265,623" and insert "$4,712,303"
Section 3. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 4 be AMENDED:
BUREAU OF HUMAN RESOURCES AND ADMINISTRATION (BHRA)
(2) Central Services
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$20,094,513" and insert "$20,488,796"

26.651.13 2 78
(3) State Engineer
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$385,946" and insert "$419,954"
(4) Statewide Maintenance and Repair
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$13,498,276" and insert "$24,707,545"
(5) Office of Hearing Examiners
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$90,886" and insert "$97,263"
(7) Risk Management Administration - Informational
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$9,324,175" and insert "$9,341,180"
(10) Personnel Management/Employee Benefits
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$3,602,112" and insert "$3,966,736"
Section 4. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 5 be AMENDED:
BUREAU OF INFORMATION AND TELECOMMUNICATIONS (BIT)
(1) Data Centers
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$8,681,679" and insert "$10,624,565"
(2) Development
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$2,494,796" and insert "$2,717,820"
(3) Telecommunications Services
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$20,704,510" and insert "$20,803,629"
(4) South Dakota Public Broadcasting
Personal Services, General Funds, delete "$3,987,654" and insert "$4,245,278"
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$1,597,615" and insert "$1,339,991"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$1,583,294" and insert "$1,625,568"
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 3 78
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$272,484" and insert "$3,641,933"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$2,959,669" and insert "$2,921,240"
(5) BIT Administration
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$4,596,024" and insert "$5,696,024"
(6) State Radio Engineering
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$3,659,509" and insert "$3,672,327"
Section 5. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 6 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
(2) Business Tax
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$0" and insert "$292,000"
(3) Motor Vehicles
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$9,024,503" and insert "$9,204,503"
(4) Property Taxes
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$270,493" and insert "$418,813"
Section 6. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 7 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND NATURAL RESOURCES
(1) Administration, Secretary of Agriculture
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$1,266,780" and insert "$2,266,780"
(2) Agricultural and Environmental Services
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$3,644,571" and insert "$3,094,571"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$3,883,169" and insert "$4,283,169"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$1,828,201" and insert "$2,078,201"
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 4 78
(3) Resource Conservation & Forestry
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$427,967" and insert "$402,967"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$1,810,288" and insert "$1,560,288"
(13) State Fair
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$1,540,939" and insert "$1,715,939"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$3,359,908" and insert "$3,184,908"
(15) Office of Water
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$1,191,526" and insert "$1,741,526"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$449,048" and insert "$474,048"
Section 7. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 8 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF TOURISM
(1) Tourism
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$2,758,978" and insert "$2,898,978"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$21,416,353" and insert "$21,276,353"
Section 8. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 9 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF GAME, FISH AND PARKS
(5) State Parks and Recreation - Development and Improvement
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$9,595,000" and insert "$12,095,000"
Section 9. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 11 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES
(1) Administration, Secretary of Social Services
Personal Services, General Funds, delete "$7,294,857" and insert "$7,649,630"
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 5 78
Personal Services, Federal Funds, delete "$8,747,179" and insert "$9,149,283"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$7,867,851" and insert "$9,811,526"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$14,433,904" and insert "$14,874,349"
F.T.E, delete "201.2" and insert "205.2"
(2) Economic Assistance
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$20,761,945" and insert "$21,602,053"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$112,859,123" and insert "$116,909,123"
(3) Medical Services
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$391,703,409" and insert "$384,746,020"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$896,903,270" and insert "$889,461,347"
(4) Children's Services
Personal Services, Federal Funds, delete "$12,334,869" and insert "$12,285,366"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$52,957,529" and insert "$52,605,318"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$41,939,948" and insert "$41,146,902"
(5) Behavioral Health
Personal Services, General Funds, delete "$42,849,948" and insert "$42,495,175"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$96,506,062" and insert "$94,495,249"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$4,052,611" and insert "$13,052,611"
F.T.E, delete "554.0" and insert "550.0"
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 6 78
Section 10. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 12 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
(1) Administration, Secretary of Health
Personal Services, General Funds, delete "$1,693,045" and insert "$2,353,374"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$1,922,621" and insert "$2,222,621"
(5) Tobacco Prevention
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$2,020,174" and insert "$2,220,174"
Section 11. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 13 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND REGULATION
(1) Administration, Secretary of Labor
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$9,814,053" and insert "$8,947,053"
Section 12. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 14 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
(1) General Operations
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$88,242,123" and insert "$89,058,569"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$117,959,372" and insert "$117,142,926"
F.T.E, delete "1,014.3" and insert "1,025.3"
Section 13. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 15 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(3) State Aid to General Education
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$619,833,511" and insert "$604,270,797"
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 7 78
(5) Sparsity Payments
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$2,615,722" and insert "$2,630,545"
(8) Technical Colleges
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$41,906,050" and insert "$49,284,202"
(9) Education Resources
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$229,682,768" and insert "$230,064,221"
Section 14. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 16 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
(2) Highway Patrol
Personal Services, Federal Funds, delete "$1,794,743" and insert "$2,052,593"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$2,521,370" and insert "$2,395,520"
(4) Criminal Justice Services
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$2,616,011" and insert "$2,779,194"
(5) 911 Coordination Board - Informational
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$4,399,301" and insert "$6,140,470"
Section 15. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 17 be AMENDED:
BOARD OF REGENTS
(1) Board of Regents Central Office
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$20,173,327" and insert "$39,619,891"
(3) South Dakota Scholarships
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$6,572,724" and insert "$6,510,440"
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 8 78
(4) University of South Dakota
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$59,924,736" and insert "$60,274,736"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$4,432,804" and insert "$4,124,410"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$44,444,324" and insert "$47,536,869"
(6) University of South Dakota School of Medicine
Personal Services, General Funds, delete "$27,468,658" and insert "$27,416,225"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$4,351,824" and insert "$4,404,257"
(7) South Dakota State University
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$102,639,971" and insert "$104,229,971"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$7,029,724" and insert "$7,599,067"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$84,368,609" and insert "$90,528,609"
F.T.E, delete "1,580.7" and insert "1,599.7"
(8) SDSU Extension
Personal Services, Federal Funds, delete "$4,533,880" and insert "$6,033,880"
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$1,408,209" and insert "$1,608,209"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$3,846,012" and insert "$4,846,012"
(9) Agricultural Experiment Station
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$15,371,274" and insert "$16,671,274"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$13,338,378" and insert "$14,838,378"
(10) SD School of Mines and Technology
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$1,562,628" and insert "$1,766,779"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$19,646,298" and insert "$20,646,298"
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 9 78
(11) Northern State University
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$13,477,454" and insert "$13,904,454"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$1,303,552" and insert "$1,292,378"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$13,079,479" and insert "$13,379,479"
(13) Black Hills State University
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$15,050,469" and insert "$15,975,469"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$1,063,429" and insert "$1,035,818"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$13,867,559" and insert "$15,842,559"
(14) Dakota State University
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$1,051,143" and insert "$1,283,803"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$20,393,289" and insert "$20,718,289"
(15) SD Services for the Deaf
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$3,912" and insert "$28,912"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$728,996" and insert "$732,634"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$464,711" and insert "$964,711"
(16) SD School for the Blind and Visually Impaired
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$643,611" and insert "$649,659"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$163,108" and insert "$263,108"
Section 16. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 18 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF THE MILITARY
(2) Army Guard
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$2,625,125" and insert "$3,770,303"
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 10 78
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$13,828,194" and insert "$17,571,839"
(3) Air Guard
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$335,697" and insert "$342,242"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$4,117,564" and insert "$4,137,199"
Section 17. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 19 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' AFFAIRS
(2) State Veterans' Home
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$0" and insert "$936,814"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$3,740,127" and insert "$3,927,365"
(3) State Veterans' Cemetery
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$10,000" and insert "$100,475"
Section 18. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 20 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(2) Mike Durfee State Prison
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$11,797,776" and insert "$12,275,117"
(3) State Penitentiary
Personal Services, General Funds, delete "$28,207,728" and insert "$28,971,447"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$9,785,217" and insert "$9,903,322"
F.T.E, delete "317.0" and insert "327.0"
(4) Women's Prison
Personal Services, General Funds, delete "$7,709,343" and insert "$9,332,184"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$3,222,260" and insert "$3,756,737"
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 11 78
F.T.E, delete "89.0" and insert "105.4"
(6) Inmate Services
Personal Services, General Funds, delete "$20,606,830" and insert "$18,952,437"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$24,530,357" and insert "$26,529,196"
F.T.E, delete "197.9" and insert "177.9"
(8) Juvenile Community Corrections
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$12,516,593" and insert "$11,098,985"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$1,766,879" and insert "$1,438,997"
Section 19. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 21 be AMENDED:
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES
(1) Administration, Secretary of Human Services
Personal Services, General Funds, delete "$1,608,320" and insert "$1,662,373"
Personal Services, Federal Funds, delete "$1,473,781" and insert "$1,527,834"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$259,057" and insert "$265,894"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$212,326" and insert "$219,163"
F.T.E, delete "30.0" and insert "31.0"
(2) Developmental Disabilities
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$134,885,529" and insert "$143,443,918"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$152,836,987" and insert "$163,354,836"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$10,085,783" and insert "$11,433,373"
(3) South Dakota Developmental Center - Redfield
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$2,799,351" and insert "$2,801,306"
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 12 78
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$2,864,141" and insert "$2,866,219"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$857,224" and insert "$1,117,488"
(4) Long Term Services and Supports
Personal Services, General Funds, delete "$3,506,641" and insert "$3,486,141"
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$33,081" and insert "$53,581"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$159,340,307" and insert "$161,113,836"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$192,548,183" and insert "$193,879,869"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$948,923" and insert "$1,332,243"
(7) Service to the Blind and Visually Impaired
Personal Services, General Funds, delete "$702,551" and insert "$648,498"
Personal Services, Federal Funds, delete "$1,706,699" and insert "$1,652,646"
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$485,274" and insert "$478,437"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$1,469,148" and insert "$1,462,311"
F.T.E, delete "29.2" and insert "28.2"
Section 20. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 24 be AMENDED:
UNIFIED JUDICIAL SYSTEM
(2) Unified Judicial System
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$6,948,534" and insert "$6,690,682"
Section 21. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 25 be AMENDED:
LEGISLATIVE BRANCH
(1) Legislative Operations
SLE, General Funds, delete "$9,458,352" and insert "$9,493,373"
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 13 78
Section 22. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 26 be AMENDED:
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
(1) Legal Services Program
Personal Services, Federal Funds, delete "$468,327" and insert "$708,009"
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$2,530,126" and insert "$2,290,444"
(2) Criminal Investigation
Personal Services, Federal Funds, delete "$1,247,335" and insert "$1,706,321"
Personal Services, Other Funds, delete "$4,042,263" and insert "$3,583,277"
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$3,401,358" and insert "$4,269,294"
Operating Expenses, Other Funds, delete "$3,434,633" and insert "$3,378,787"
(3) Law Enforcement Training
Operating Expenses, Federal Funds, delete "$0" and insert "$499,793"
Section 23. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 28 be AMENDED:
SECRETARY OF STATE
(1) Secretary of State
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$577,781" and insert "$602,581"
Section 24. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 29 be AMENDED:
STATE TREASURER
(3) Unclaimed Property Operations
Operating Expenses, General Funds, delete "$801,675" and insert "$914,175"
Section 25. Adjust all totals accordingly in sections 1 to 25, inclusive, of this Act.
Section 26. That 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216, § 34 be AMENDED:
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 14 78
Section 34. The state treasurer shall transfer to the general fund, from the dakota
cement trust fund, moneys in the amount identified by notice of the state investment
officer pursuant to S.D. Const., Art. XIII, § 21, for the Department of Education - state
aid to education.
Section 27. That a NEW SECTION be added to 2025 Session Laws, chapter 216:
Section 37. The state treasurer shall transfer $10,000,000 from the state general fund
to the IT modernization fund.
Section 38. The state treasurer shall transfer $3,100,000 from the state general fund to
the reemployment assistance modernization fund.
Section 39. The state treasurer shall transfer $1,500,000 from the state general fund to
the court security fund.
Section 40. Up to $11,209,269 in general funds appropriated in subsection 4 of section
4 of this Act which are unspent may be carried over until June 30, 2028.
Section 41. Up to $16,696,564 in general funds appropriated in subsection 1 of section
17 of this Act which are unspent may be carried over until June 30, 2028.
Section 42. Up to $1,128,394 in general funds and $3,690,279 in federal fund
expenditure authority appropriated in subsection 2 of section 18 of this Act which are unspent
may be carried over until June 30, 2028.
Section 28. Funds appropriated by this Act, which are unspent at the end of fiscal year 2026,
may be carried over to fiscal year 2027.
Section 29. This Act is effective beginning June 29, 2026.
SB78 ENROLLED

26.651.13 15 78
An Act to revise the General Appropriations Act for fiscal year 2026.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 78
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 78 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB78 ENROLLED